Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 7 Regulation of Mines
11-7-313. Washroom and lockers.

It shall be the duty of every owner or lessee, its officers and agents, or other persons having jurisdiction or direction of any coal mine within the State of Arkansas to provide a suitable building which shall be convenient to the principal entrance of the mine and equipped with individual lockers or hangers, benches or seats, proper light, heat, hot and cold water, and shower baths, and maintain them in good order for the use and benefit of all persons employed in or about the mine.

The building shall be constructed so as to give sufficient floor space for the accommodation of miners or others using it.

The flooring in the washroom of the building is to be made of concrete or cement, but the material used in flooring the changing room shall be optional with the owner, lessee, or person operating or directing the operation of the mine.

All lockers required by this section, when made of steel, shall be not less than twelve inches (12") in width, twelve inches (12") in depth, and sixty inches (60") in height.

When the lockers are made of lumber, they shall not be less than twelve inches (12") in depth, twelve inches (12") in width, and sixty inches (60") in height, with partitions in the center.

Individual hangers shall consist of not less than three (3) suitable hooks upon which to hang clothing and a receptacle of suitable size for use in connection therewith, attached to a proper chain or wire rope, and suspended so as to admit of the hanger being raised to such height that the wearing apparel, when hung thereon, will not be less than seven feet (7') above the floor of the building and capable of being locked in that position.

The lockers or hangers in each washhouse shall be sufficient in number to accommodate all employees of the mine or mines, and there shall be one (1) shower bath for each fifteen (15) employees.

The employees shall furnish their own towels, soap, and lock for their lockers or hangers and shall exercise control over and be responsible for the property by them left therein.

It shall be the duty of all persons using the washhouses to remove therefrom all cast-off wearing apparel.

Every corporation, company, partnership, or person, who or which shall construct any building required by subsections (a)-(d) of this section and shall install the washhouse and washhouse facilities as required therein, shall at all times during the operation of any mine keep them in a clean and sanitary condition but shall not be liable for the loss or destruction of any property of employees left in the building.

It shall be the duty of the State Mine Inspector, and he or she is by this section authorized, to require washhouses already in existence to be so changed, remodeled, and improved as to comply with the provisions of this section. He or she shall have general supervision of this chapter and its enforcement.

Any owner or lessee, its officers or agents, or other person or persons failing or refusing to comply with the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Each day's violation shall constitute a separate offense and shall be punished as such.

It shall be unlawful for any person to break, injure, or destroy any part or appurtenance to any washhouse or commit any nuisance therein.

Any person adjudged guilty of a violation of this subsection shall be fined in any sum not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Acts 1919, No. 134, §§ 1-4, 6; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7287-7290, 7292; Pope's Dig., §§ 9343-9346, 9348; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-621—52-624, 52-626.

11-7-314. Use of water on cutter bars and jackhammers required.

In order to promote safety in coal mines by eliminating the hazards of coal and rock dust in coal mines, it is made the duty of every person, partnership, association, corporation, owner, operator, or lessee of any coal mine in this state to employ and use water on the cutter bars of all mining machines while cutting rock or coal in the mines and on all jackhammer drills while drilling in the mines in either coal or rock.

Any person, partnership, association, corporation, owner, operator, or lessee of any coal mine in this state who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined in any sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). Each separate instance of the violation of this section, either by the cutting machines or the jackhammers, shall be deemed a separate offense.

It is also made unlawful for any person, miner, operator of a jackhammer drill, or machine runner to operate either a mining machine without water on the cutter bar or a jackhammer drill contrary to the provisions of this section. Any person so doing shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined in any sum not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100). Each separate operation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 139, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-627—52-629.

11-7-315. Daily inspection by fire boss.

In all mines where a fire boss is employed, all working places and worked-out places adjacent to working places shall be examined, when it can be done, at least once a day by a competent fire boss. It shall be his or her duty to enter a report of existing conditions of the working places and worked-out places in a well-bound book to be kept by him or her for that purpose.

All dangerous places that are marked out shall be marked on a blackboard, furnished by the company, before any other employee enters the mine.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 225, § 10, p. 567; C. & M. Dig., § 7279; Pope's Dig., § 9335; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-609.

11-7-316. High water danger.

Whenever and wherever a coal mine in this state becomes dangerous from high water or overflow of streams adjacent thereto, whereby the lives of miners employed therein are jeopardized by reason of the high water, it shall be the duty of the managers of the coal mine to call the miners out of the mine and forbid their working therein until the danger is past.

Failure to act as required in subsection (a) of this section is made a misdemeanor.

Upon conviction, the manager shall be fined in any sum not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisoned not less than six (6) months nor more than one (1) year.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 225, § 18, p. 567; C. & M. Dig., § 7285; Pope's Dig., § 9341; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-616.

11-7-317. Reports of accidents.

Whenever loss of life or serious personal injury shall occur by reason of any explosion or of any accident whatever in or about any mine, it shall be the duty of the person having charge of the mine to report the facts thereof without delay to the State Mine Inspector and, if any person is killed thereby, to notify the coroner or some justice of the peace of the county.

It shall be the duty of the mine inspector to investigate and ascertain the cause of the explosion and file a report thereof with the other records of his or her office.

To enable him or her to make the investigations, he or she shall have power to compel attendance of witnesses, take depositions, and administer oaths, and the cost of the examination shall be paid by the county as costs of coroners' inquests are now paid.

Failure of the person in charge of the mine where the accident occurred to give the mine inspector notice thereof shall be a misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 9, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7268; Pope's Dig., § 9324; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-617.

11-7-318. Age of miners.

No person under the age of eighteen (18) years shall be permitted to enter any mine to work therein.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 7, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7266; Pope's Dig., § 9322; Acts 1949, No. 268, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-612; 2005, No. 442, § 1.

Cross References.

Certain kinds of employment of children under 16 prohibited, § 11-6-106.

11-7-319. Bond for semimonthly payment of wages.

Every person, firm, association, or corporation engaged in mining or producing coal or in the operation of a coal mine or coal mining business and employing more than three (3) persons in connection therewith shall give a qualified bond with good and sufficient surety to the State of Arkansas, for the use and benefit of the employees, conditioned to the effect that the employer will pay to the employees semimonthly the full amount that shall be due the employees on each semimonthly payday, as defined in this section.

The bond shall be in the amount as scheduled in this subsection, based upon the number of employees of any coal mine for which the bond is made, as follows:

Where the number of employees is not less than three (3) but less than twelve (12), the bond shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500);

Where the number of employees is not less than twelve (12) but less than fifty (50), the bond shall be eight thousand dollars ($8,000);

Where the number of employees is not less than fifty (50) but less than one hundred fifty (150), the amount of the bond shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

Where the number of employees is not less than one hundred fifty (150) but less than three hundred (300), the amount of the bond shall be fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000);

Where the number of employees is three hundred (300) or more, the amount of the bond shall be twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

In the event any one (1) person, firm, association, or corporation shall operate more than one (1) coal mine, a separate bond shall be given for the benefit of the employees in each mine.

The bond shall be filed with the clerk of the circuit court and shall be approved by the circuit court of the county where the labor, to secure the payment of which the bond is given, shall be performed.

In the event of variance in the number of employees, or when any bond shall not conform with the above schedule, any employee or interested person may, upon showing to the circuit court, have the court declare the number of employees of the employer in any mine, and thereupon, the court shall fix the amount of bond required by appropriate order.

Any interested person may appeal the order in the manner now provided by law.

The bond shall secure claims for labor only, including assignees of claims for labor and those who have advanced any money or thing of value to any employee on the order of his employer.

Any employee or group of employees, who shall not be paid their wages when due, may proceed against the principal and sureties on the bond in an action in the circuit court of the county where the mine at which the labor was performed is situated, and for this purpose the mine shall be deemed to be situated at the place where its principal opening is situated.

Any employees in the same mine may join in one (1) action, and process in the action shall run throughout the state.

In an action brought to recover on the bond, the court shall assess a reasonable attorney's fee for the attorney for the plaintiff if the plaintiff prevails therein, the fee to be adjudged as costs against the principal and sureties in the bond.

No wages shall be deemed to be due for labor performed during the first half of any month until the first weekday of the following month and for labor performed during the last half of any month until the sixteenth day of the following month, and any action to recover on the bond must be commenced within thirty (30) days from the date of default in the payment of wages when due.

Any person, firm, association, or corporation who shall fail or refuse to comply with the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation.

When any person, firm, or corporation shall fail or refuse to comply herewith, the State Mine Inspector or any interested person may apply to the circuit court having jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (a)(4) of this section for an order enjoining and preventing the operation of any mine, by anyone, until this section is complied with, and upon proper showing, the order shall be made by the circuit court.

The mine inspector, in his or her official capacity, shall not be required to give bond to obtain the order.

Any regularly constituted labor union of mining laborers shall be deemed an interested person within the meaning of this section.

This section shall not prevent the enforcement of any remedies now provided for laborers to enforce payment of their wages but shall be cumulative thereto; provided, the remedy here provided must be exhausted before any other remedy may be invoked.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 116, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 8543-8548; Acts 1939, No. 193, §§ 1, 2; 1957, No. 338, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-630, 52-631.

Subchapter 4
— Employee Certification

Publisher's Notes.

The Coal Mine Examining Board, referred to throughout this subchapter, has been abolished and its powers transferred to the Director of the Department of Labor. See Publisher's Notes, § 11-7-401.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1919, No. 486, § 10: May 1, 1919.

Acts 1949, No. 268, § 22: effective on passage and approval.

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-7-401. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning Coal Mine Examining Board members, organization, and proceedings, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 266, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1919, No. 486, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7317, 7318; Pope's Dig., §§ 9373, 9374; A.S.A. 1947,§§ 52-501, 52-502; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 59.

11-7-402. Director of the Division of Labor — Power to administer oaths.

To more effectively carry out the intentions and purposes of this section and §§ 11-7-409 — 11-7-414, the Director of the Division of Labor may administer oaths to all persons who are applicants, or who may vouch, in any manner, for the previous service or qualifications of an applicant to obtain for him or her a certificate under this section and §§ 11-7-409 — 11-7-414.

A person who falsely testifies or swears to any matter material to the examination or to the service or qualification of an applicant is guilty of perjury.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 268, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-517; Acts 2017, No. 266, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5347.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Director of the Department of Labor” for “Coal Mine Examining Board” in the section heading; in (a), substituted “To” for “In order to”, “the Director of the Department of Labor may administer oaths to all” for “members of the Coal Mine Examining Board shall have the power to administer oaths to any and all”, “an applicant” for “any applicant in order”, and “under” for “pursuant to”; and, in (b), substituted “A person who falsely testifies or swears” for “Any person who shall falsely testify or swear”, “the” for “such” preceding “examination”, and “an applicant is guilty of perjury” for “any applicant shall be deemed guilty of perjury and upon conviction shall be subject to the penalties prescribed by the laws of the State of Arkansas against those who commit perjury”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

Cross References.

Perjury, § 5-53-101 et seq.

11-7-403. Fire bosses, mine foremen, etc. — Examination — Qualifications.

No fire bosses, hoisting engineers, or mine foremen shall be employed in any mine in the State of Arkansas unless they have been examined by the Division of Labor or the division determines that comparable testing criteria have been met in another jurisdiction.

No one shall act as State Mine Inspector or Assistant State Mine Inspector unless he or she has been examined by the division, as provided in this section.

Applicants for examination shall be able to read and write the English language and shall satisfy the division that they are of good moral character and are not users of intoxicating liquors and are citizens of the United States.

All applicants shall be thoroughly examined with reference to the duties of the positions for which they have applied for a certificate.

Applicants for certificates as mine foremen shall be at least twenty-five (25) years old and shall have had at least five (5) years' experience as practical coal miners, mining engineers, or persons of general underground experience.

Applicants for certificates as fire bosses shall have like qualifications and experience in the mines of Arkansas or elsewhere and shall also have had experience in mines that generate explosive and noxious gases.

Applicants for certificates as mine inspector shall, before examination, pay to the division a fee of four dollars ($4.00) and, if successful, a further fee of six dollars ($6.00) for a certificate.

Applicants for certificates as assistant mine inspector shall, before examination, pay to the division a fee of three dollars ($3.00) and, if successful, a further fee of four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) for a certificate.

Applicants for certificates as mine foremen and hoisting engineers shall, before examination, pay to the division a fee of two dollars ($2.00) and, if successful, a further fee of three dollars ($3.00) for a certificate.

Other applicants shall, before examination, pay to the division of examiners a fee of one dollar ($1.00) and, if successful, a further fee of two dollars ($2.00) for a certificate.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 486, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 7319; Pope's Dig., § 9375; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-503; Acts 2003, No. 358, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
5348, 5349.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

11-7-404. Fire bosses, mine foremen, etc. — Certificate — Grades.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall grant certificates after examination by the Division of Labor or a determination by the division that the testing requirements have been satisfied in another jurisdiction.

The certificates shall be granted to all applicants who through these testing procedures have shown themselves to be familiar with the duties of the position for which they desire certificates and are capable of performing the duties.

Certificates of the first grade shall be granted only to applicants who by oral or written examinations in the presence of and relating to explosive gas have shown themselves competent to act as mine foremen in mines which generate explosive and noxious gases, and the certificate shall so state.

Certificates for mine inspector and assistant mine inspector shall be granted only to applicants who have shown themselves duly qualified, as provided by the law creating the office, and no appointments shall be made to these offices unless the appointee shall hold a certificate.

Anyone holding a first grade foreman's certificate may serve as a foreman in any mine and may serve as fire boss.

Anyone holding a second grade mine foreman's certificate may serve as any of the above, except as fire boss and foreman in mines which generate explosive or noxious gases.

In case of emergency, a mine owner, with consent of the director, may employ a trustworthy or experienced man or woman who does not possess a certificate, for a period of not more than thirty (30) days as mine foreman or fire boss.

If the holder of a permit fails to qualify after thirty (30) days, his or her permit shall be revoked.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 486, §§ 4, 5; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7320, 7321; Pope's Dig., §§ 9376, 9377; Acts 1949, No. 268, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-504, 52-505; Acts 2003, No. 358, § 2; 2017, No. 266, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 5350.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated (b)(3) as (b)(3)(A) and (b)(3)(B); in (b)(3)(A), substituted “a mine owner, with consent of the director, may employ a” for “any mine owner, with consent of the Coal Mine Examining Board, may employ any”, and “does not” for “shall not”; and, in (b)(3)(B), substituted “If” for “In the event that”.

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”, “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor”, and “division” for “department”.

11-7-405. Fire bosses, mine foremen, etc. — Duplicate certificate.

In case of loss or destruction of a certificate, the Director of the Division of Labor, upon satisfactory proof of the loss or destruction, may issue a duplicate on the payment of the sum of one dollar ($1.00).

History.

Acts 1919, No. 486, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 7323; Pope's Dig., § 9379; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-507; Acts 2017, No. 266, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 5351.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Director of the Department of Labor” for “secretary of the examining board”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”.

11-7-406. Fire bosses, mine foremen, etc. — Revocation of certificate.

All certificates issued pursuant to this subchapter may be revoked by the Director of the Division of Labor after a hearing upon due notice to the holder of the certificate and upon written charges preferred by the director or by some interested person for violation of this section and §§ 11-7-403 — 11-7-405 and 11-7-407.

A complaint may be filed against the holder of a certificate for intoxication, mental disabilities, neglect of duty, or other sufficient cause.

The holder of the certificate so cancelled shall have the right to appear before the director after the expiration of three (3) months and be reexamined if he or she shall first satisfy the director that the incapacity complained of has ceased to exist.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 486, § 8; C. & M. Dig., § 7324; Pope's Dig., § 9380; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-508; Acts 2017, No. 266, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 5352.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “Director of the Department of Labor” for “board of examiners”, “director” for “board”, and “this section and §§ 11-7-403 — 11-7-405 and 11-7-407” for “§§ 11-7-401 and 11-7-403 — 11-7-407”; and, in (b)(2), substituted “director” for “examining board”, inserted “or she”, substituted “director” for “board” following “satisfy the”, and substituted “has” for “shall have” preceding “ceased”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-7-407. Fire bosses, mine foremen, etc. — Misrepresentation of certificate.

Any person who shall forge, alter, or counterfeit a certificate, shall secure or attempt to secure employment by use of the forged, altered, or counterfeited certificate, or shall falsely represent that he is a holder of a certificate regularly issued him shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 486, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 7322; Pope's Dig., § 9378; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-506.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

11-7-408. Penalty for violation of § 11-7-401 and §§ 11-7-403 — 11-7-407.

Any owner, operator, lessee, or agent of any coal mine in the State of Arkansas violating any of the provisions of § 11-7-401 and §§ 11-7-403 — 11-7-407 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon conviction, he or she shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or be imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or both.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 486, § 9; C. & M. Dig., § 7325; Pope's Dig., § 9381; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-509.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

11-7-409. Coal miners — Definition.

The term “coal miner” as used in §§ 11-7-402 and 11-7-410 — 11-7-414, unless the context otherwise requires, shall be construed to mean any person working underground or in development in shafts, slopes, drifts, or tunnels for the extraction or production of coal or rock.

The term “coal miner” in strip pit operation is defined as only those employees engaged in the extraction of coal from the pit.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 268, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-511.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

11-7-410. Coal miners — Certificate required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to work as a coal miner in any coal mine in this state without first having a certificate of qualification and competency to do so from the Director of the Division of Labor, nor shall any person, firm, or corporation employ as a coal miner in his or her coal mine in the State of Arkansas any person who does not hold a certificate, nor shall any mine foreman, overseer, or superintendent permit or suffer any person to be employed under him or her, or in any coal mine under his or her charge or supervision, as a coal miner in this state, except as provided in this act, who does not hold a certificate of qualification.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates any of the provisions of this section or § 11-7-411 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction shall be fined in the sum of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or by imprisonment for a term of not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court or jury trying the case.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 268, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-516; Acts 2017, No. 266, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 5353.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Director of the Department of Labor” for “Coal Mine Examining Board of this state” in (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1949, No. 268, codified as §§ 11-7-207, 11-7-301, 11-7-304, 11-7-305, 11-7-306, 11-7-308, 11-7-309, 11-7-311, 11-7-318, 11-7-402, 11-7-404, 11-7-409 — 11-7-414, 15-59-106 [repealed].

11-7-411. Coal miners — Examination — Qualifications — Certificates.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall hold sufficient examinations each year in places to be determined by the director, which, in his or her opinion, will be most convenient to applicants desiring to engage in the business of coal mining.

All examinations held by the director shall be conducted in the English language and shall be of a practical nature, so as to determine the competency and qualifications of each applicant.

The director shall:

Examine under oath all persons who apply for certificates, except those regularly employed in the State of Arkansas and exempted under § 11-7-409, as to their previous experience as coal miners; and

Grant certificates of competency and qualification to such applicants as the director finds to be qualified.

The certificate, when so issued, entitles the holder to be employed as, and to do the work of, a coal miner in this state.

A certificate of competency and qualification shall not be issued or delivered to any person under this act, unless:

He or she first produces evidence of having had not less than two (2) years of practical experience working as a coal miner or working with a coal miner; and

He or she is competent to mine coal in the coal mines of this state.

In no case shall the applicant be deemed competent or qualified under this act unless he or she appears in person before the director and orally answers correctly at least twelve (12) practical questions propounded to him or her by the director pertaining to requirements and qualifications of a practical coal miner.

The director shall keep an accurate record of proceedings and meetings and in the record shall show a correct detailed account of the examination of each applicant with the questions asked and his or her answers, and the director shall keep the records open for the inspection of the parties in interest.

A miner's certificate granted under this act is not transferable, and any effort to transfer the certificate shall be deemed a violation of this act.

The certificate shall be issued and signed by the director.

Each applicant for the certificate provided for under this section shall pay a fee of fifty cents (50¢) to the director at the time of making application and, if successful in the examination, shall pay an additional fee of fifty cents (50¢) for the certificate.

All fees collected from applicants shall be paid into the Coal Mine Examining Fund and paid out of the fund as other moneys are paid out.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 268, §§ 12-14; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-512—52-514; Acts 2017, No. 266, § 7; 2019, No. 910, § 5354.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, substituted “Director of the Department of Labor” for “Coal Mine Examining Board of this state” in (a), “director” for “Coal Mine Examining Board” in the introductory language of (b), and “director” for “board” or “examining board” throughout the section; substituted “his or her” for “its” in (a); redesignated (c) as (c)(1), (c)(2)(A), and (c)(2)(B); in (c)(1), substituted “apply” for “may apply” and deleted “the provisions of” following “under”; in (c)(2)(A), substituted “Grant” for “shall grant” and “finds” for “may find”; substituted “entitles the holder” for “shall entitle the holder thereof” in (c)(2)(B); in the introductory language of (d)(1), substituted “A” for “No” and inserted “not” following “shall”; substituted “produces” for “shall produce” in (d)(1)(A); deleted “intelligently and” following “answers” in (d)(2); deleted “at each of its meetings” following “answers, and” in (e); in (f), substituted “A” for “No”, deleted “the provisions of” following “under”, and substituted “is not” for “shall be”; in (g), substituted “and signed by the director” for “only at meetings of the board, and the certificate shall not be legal unless signed by at least a majority of the members of the board”; substituted “under this section” for “herein” in (h)(1); and deleted “these” preceding “applicants” in (h)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 11-7-410.

11-7-412. Coal miners — Temporary permit — Grandfather clause.

A person making application for a coal miner's certificate of competency and qualification shall be granted a temporary permit to work until such time as an examination is held by the Director of the Division of Labor and if, in the judgment of the director, he or she is so qualified.

All fees collected from the applicants shall be paid into the Coal Mine Examining Fund and paid out of the fund as other moneys are paid out.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 268, §§ 12, 13; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-512, 52-513; Acts 2017, No. 266, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 5355.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “Director of the Department of Labor and” for “board” and “director, he or she” for “board, he”; deleted (b); and redesignated former (c) as present (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 11-7-410.

11-7-413. Coal miners — Apprentices.

Any certified miner may have one (1) person working with him or her and under his or her direction, in addition to any member of his or her immediate family, as an apprentice for the purpose of learning the business of coal mining and becoming qualified to obtain a certificate in conformity with the provisions of this act.

Any apprentice shall first be regularly employed by the owner of the coal mine in the same manner as the other employees.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 268, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-510.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 11-7-410.

11-7-414. Coal miners — Duplicate certificate — Revocation of certificate.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall possess powers to issue duplicate certificates and revoke certificates in all cases as provided in §§ 11-7-405 and 11-7-406.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 268, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-515; Acts 2017, No. 266, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 5356.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 536, § 2, abolished the Coal Mine Examining Board and transferred its powers, duties, and functions to the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Director of the Department of Labor” for “Coal Mining Examining Board”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”.